California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) Any gasoline-oxygenate blend containing methanol shall also contain an alcohol cosolvent (butanol or higher molecular weight alcohol) in an amount equal to or greater than the volume percentage of methanol except those blends previously granted a waiver by
 the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

(c) The antiknock index as defined in Section 13400 for gasoline, gasoline oxygenated blends, and dimethyl ether-propane fuel blends shall not be less than 87.

(d) Gasoline and gasoline-oxygenate blends shall meet the latest specifications set forth in ASTM International Standard Specification D4814.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, gasoline sold for use in Inyo or Mono County, or the portion of Kern County lying east of the Los Angeles County Aqueduct, shall comply with the latest specification set forth in ASTM International Standard Specification D4814 relating to volatility class standards for the season during which the gasoline is
 sold for either the interior region or the southeast region of California.

(f) Ethanol fuel blends shall meet the latest specifications set forth in ASTM International Standard Specification D5798.

(g) Methanol fuel blends shall meet the latest specifications set forth in ASTM International Standard Specification D5797.

(h) Liquefied petroleum gas for use as a motor vehicle fuel shall meet the latest specifications set forth in ASTM International Standard Specification D1835.

(i) Dimethyl ether-propane fuel blends for use as motor vehicle fuel shall meet the latest specifications set forth by the ASTM International. If no ASTM International specifications exist, the secretary
 shall establish interim specifications by regulation.

(j) Natural gas for use as a motor vehicle fuel shall meet the latest specification set forth by the ASTM International or SAE International.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 117, Sec. 2.   (AB 2663)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13440.5.

For purposes of determining the percentage of ethanol in a gasoline-oxygenate blend for use as a fuel, the volume of ethanol includes the volume of any denaturant (including gasoline) that is added to the extent that these denaturants do not exceed the maximum volume percent specified in the latest standard established by ASTM International, except that no standard shall be less stringent than required by any California state law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 17.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13441.

It is unlawful for any person to sell any product as, or purporting to be, gasoline or automotive spark-ignition engine fuel, unless the product conforms to the specifications of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 167, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------

13442.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to sell, offer for sale, or cause or permit to be sold or offered for sale, or deliver or offer for delivery, any product used as a motor vehicle fuel for internal combustion engines at any place where motor vehicle fuels are kept or stored for sale, which does not conform to the requirements of this article, unless and until there shall be firmly attached to or painted upon each container, receptacle, pump, and inlet end of the fill pipe of each underground storage tank, or other equipment used for storage of motor vehicle fuel, from which or into which the motor vehicle fuel is drawn or poured for sale or delivery, a sign or label, plainly visible, comprising the brand, trademark, or trade name of such fuel, or
 the words “no brand,” that words shall be in letters of gothic type with a stroke of not less than one-eighth inch in width and not less than one inch in height, and also the words “not gasoline” in red letters of gothic type with a stroke of not less than one-half inch in width and not less than three inches in height, on a white background and not less than twice the size of any other letters or words appearing on or near the label or sign.

(b) The provisions of this article, as to the words “not gasoline,” shall not apply to signs or labels used in connection with the sale or delivery of kerosene, jet or turbine fuel, diesel fuel, liquefied petroleum gas, natural gas, or motor fuel comprised of a mixture of gasoline and lubricating oil properly labeled in accordance with the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 13480).

(c) This section does not apply to electricity
 sold as a motor vehicle fuel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 18.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13443.

The sign or label required by this article to be attached to the inlet end of the fill-pipe of an underground storage tank shall consist of a tag or plate firmly attached or affixed and plainly visible while the tank is being filled. The letters on such sign or label may be of any convenient size.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Standards for Alternative Fuels [13446. - 13446.]

13446.

The department may establish interim specifications for alternative fuel for use in motor vehicles until a standards development organization accredited by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) formally adopts a standard for the fuel for use in motor vehicles. The department shall then adopt, by reference, the latest standard established by the ANSI-accredited standards development organization for alternative fuel, except that no specification shall be less stringent than required by any California state law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 21.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Standards for Compression-Ignition Engine Fuels, Kerosene, and Fuel Oils [13450. - 13451.]

13450.

The department shall establish specifications for compression-ignition engine fuel, kerosene, and fuel oil. The department shall adopt by reference the latest standards established by a recognized consensus organization or standards writing organization such as the ASTM International or the SAE International, for compression-ignition engine fuels, kerosene, and fuel oil, except that no specification shall be less stringent than required by any California state law.

(a) Diesel fuel oil and renewable diesel fuel oil shall meet the specifications set forth in ASTM International Standard Specification D975.

(b) Kerosene shall meet the specifications set forth in ASTM International
 Standard Specification D3699.

(c) Fuel oil shall meet the specifications set forth in ASTM International Standard Specification D396.

(d) Biodiesel blends shall meet the latest specifications set forth in ASTM International Standard Specification D7467.

(e) Dimethyl ether used as a motor vehicle fuel shall meet the latest specifications set forth in ASTM International Standard Specification D7901.

(f) Renewable diesel fuel shall meet the specifications set forth in ASTM International Standard Specification D975.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 23.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13451.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or deliver to any premises for the purpose of sale, any product as or purported to be “compression-ignition engine fuel,” “diesel fuel,” “kerosene,” or “fuel oil,” unless the product conforms to the specifications of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 521, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Standards for Lubricating Oils and Oils Used to Lubricate Transmissions, Gears, or Axles [13460. - 13462.]

13460.

Engine oil shall not be sold or distributed for use in an internal combustion engine unless the product conforms to the following specifications:

(a) It shall meet the engine oil requirements established by a minimum of one current API classification pursuant to the latest revision of the SAE International Standard SAE J183 for engine oil performance and engine service classification, or a minimum of one current sequence of the European Automobile Manufacturers Association (ACEA) “European Oil Specification.”

(b) It shall be free from water and suspended matter when tested by means of centrifuge, in accordance with the standard test ASTM D-2273.

(c) Any engine oil that is represented to meet SAE International SAE J183 engine oil performance and engine service classification SA must have either an acid number or base number of 0.20 mg of KOH/g as measured by ASTM International Standard Test Method D974 or equivalent.

(d) Any engine oil represented as “resource conserving” shall meet the requirements established by the latest revision of the SAE International Recommended Practice SAE J-1423.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 24.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13461.

Lubricating oil shall not be sold or distributed for use in lubricating manual transmissions, gears, or axles unless the product conforms to the following specifications:

(a) It meets the service requirements contained in the latest revision of the SAE Information Report on axle and manual transmission lubricants SAE J308.

(b) The viscosity grade classification number shall be the same as the latest published SAE International Standard SAE J306 when tested in accordance with the latest method published by the ASTM International.

(c) It shall be free from water and suspended
 matter when tested by means of centrifuge, in accordance with the standard test ASTM D-2273.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 55.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

13462.

Any manufacturer or packager of any product subject to this article and sold in this state shall provide, upon request to duly authorized representatives of the department, documentation of any claim made upon their products’ label.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1047, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Price Indications on Motor Vehicle Fuel Dispensing Apparatus [13470. - 13477.]

13470.

(a) A person shall not sell at retail to the general public, any motor vehicle fuel from any place of business in this state unless there is displayed on the dispensing apparatus in a conspicuous place at least one sign or price indicator showing the total price per gallon, liter, or other unit of measurement adopted pursuant to Section 12107, 13404, or 13404.5 of all motor vehicle fuel sold therefrom. The total price per gallon, liter, or other unit of measurement shall include applicable fuel taxes and all sales taxes.

(b) (1) A person shall not sell at retail to the general public, any compressed natural gas for use as a motor vehicle fuel from any place of business in this state unless there is
 displayed and labeled on the dispensing apparatus in a conspicuous place “Gasoline gallon equivalent.”

(2) A person shall not sell at retail to the general public, any liquefied natural gas for use as a motor vehicle fuel from any place of business in this state unless there is displayed and labeled on the dispensing apparatus in a conspicuous place “Diesel gallon equivalent.”

(c) When a discount is offered from a dispenser computing only at a higher price, at least one sign or label shall be conspicuously displayed on the dispenser indicating that the dispenser is computing at the higher price and indicating the amount of the discount per unit of measurement in letters and numerals not less than one-half inch high.

(d) If motor vehicle fuel is sold by unit of measurement other than gallon, that unit shall be
 conspicuously displayed on the side of the dispensing apparatus from which service can be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 26.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13470.5.

Any person selling, offering for sale, or advertising for sale, at retail to the general public, any gasoline or other motor vehicle fuel from any place of business in this state by use of or through or from any dispensing apparatus and displaying any sign showing the total price per liter, shall, in addition, display in a conspicuous fashion in full view of the retail purchaser and in accordance with provisions of this chapter, a gallon-to-liter conversion table showing quantity and price equivalents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 27.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13471.

Each sign required by this article shall be placed in a conspicuous place on the dispensing apparatus and if service of motor vehicle fuel may be made from more than one side of such dispensing apparatus the sign shall be so placed as to be visible from at least two sides of the dispensing apparatus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 28.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13472.

When a sign is used in addition to a price indicator, as defined in Section 13470, and if the same grade of motor vehicle fuel is sold at a different price from any other dispenser on the same premises, it shall be unlawful to display the sign on a dispenser unless a sign with price numerals of equal size is displayed upon each dispenser from which the same grade of motor vehicle fuel is dispensed at higher prices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 29.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13473.

Unless otherwise provided, all letters, figures, or numerals on each sign required by this article, however affixed, marked, imprinted, placed, or embossed, shall be at least three-fourths of an inch in height and all lines or marks used in the making or forming of all the letters, figures, or numerals which are a part of the sign shall be at least one-eighth of an inch in width.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 345, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13474.

All letters, figures, or numerals which are part of any sign or price indicator required by this article shall be plainly legible. The color or tint shall contrast with the background and other parts of the sign.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13475.

For the purpose of this article, a fraction is considered one numeral.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13477.

The provisions of this article do not apply to the sale of motor vehicle fuel for aircraft through or from any portable dispensing device.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 30.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Labeling [13480. - 13490.]

13480.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to sell any motor vehicle fuel or lubricant referred to in this chapter at any place where motor vehicle fuels or lubricants are kept or stored for sale, unless there is affixed to each container, receptacle, pump, dispenser, and inlet end of the fill pipe of each underground storage tank, from which or into which that product is drawn or poured out for sale or delivery, a sign or label plainly visible consisting of the name of the product, the brand, trademark, or trade name of the product, and, in the case of motor vehicle fuel and kerosene, the grade or brand name designation.

(b) When the product is a lubricant, as defined by Section 13400, each sign or label shall also have in letters
 or numerals, plainly visible, the viscosity grade classification as determined in accordance with the SAE International latest standard for engine oil viscosity classification SAE J300 or manual transmission and axle lubricants viscosity classification SAE J306, as applicable, and shall be preceded by the letters “SAE.”

(c) When the product is automotive spark-ignition engine fuel, the secretary shall make rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary to define and enforce the octane number, antiknock index labeling requirements, or other labeling requirements of the product sold.

(d) When the product is a motor vehicle fuel consisting of a mixture or premixture of gasoline and oil or gasoline-oxygenate blend and motor oil, there shall be conspicuously displayed on the dispensing device at least one sign or label stating the ratio of gasoline to motor oil or gasoline-oxygenate
 blend to motor oil.

(e) All signs or labels required by this section for retail motor vehicle fuel dispensers and containers of more than one gallon capacity shall be in letters and numerals not less than one-half inch (12.70 mm) in height. On containers of one gallon or less, the signs or labels shall be in letters and numerals not less than one-fourth inch (6.35 mm) in height and one-sixteenth inch (1.59 mm) in width.

(f) The provisions of this section pertaining to octane numbers or antiknock index and motor oil SAE International viscosity number grade shall not apply to products sold for aviation purposes.

(g) This section does not apply to electricity sold as a motor vehicle fuel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 31.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13481.

(a) If any motor vehicle fuel or lubricant is offered for sale, but not under any brand, trademark, or trade name, the words “no brand” shall be used as the brand, trademark, or trade name designation. The words “no brand” shall be in letters of gothic type with a stroke of not less than one-half inch in width, not less than three inches in height, and shall consist of red letters on a white background.

(b) This section does not apply to electricity sold as a motor vehicle fuel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 32.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13482.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to sell or distribute engine oil or lubricant unless both of the following are met:

(1) The product conforms to a minimum of one active API classification pursuant to the latest revision of SAE J183 “Engine Oil Performance and Engine Service Classification,” a minimum of one active sequence of the European Automobile Manufacturers’ Association (ACEA) “European Oil Sequences specification,” or a minimum of one active OEM specification.

(2) The API classification or ACEA sequence or OEM specification and SAE J300 viscosity grade is conspicuously marked on each container or, if provided in
 bulk, properly described in product transfer documents.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to sell or distribute axle and manual transmission lubricant unless it conforms to an SAE J306 viscosity grade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 33.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13483.

The provisions of this article as to size of letters shall not apply to signs or labels at the inlet end of any underground storage tank, which letters may be of any convenient size but such letters shall be plainly visible while such underground storage tank is being filled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13484.

Whenever any pump, receptacle, or other container is maintained or used to serve more than one driveway, the signs or labels required by this chapter shall be placed upon both sides of such pump, receptacle, or other container so that one set of signs or labels shall be clearly visible from each such driveway.

Wherever any pump, receptacle, or other container is maintained or used to serve only one driveway, the signs or labels required by this chapter shall be upon the side of such pump, receptacle, or other container adjacent to such driveway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13485.

Small hand measures used for delivery of motor vehicle fuels or lubricants, and filled in the presence of the customer, need not be labeled in accordance with this chapter if the receptacle, container, or pump from which motor vehicle fuels or lubricants are drawn or poured into the hand measures is properly labeled as required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 34.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13486.

(a) It is unlawful, at any place of business where motor vehicle fuels or lubricants are sold, for any person to do either of the following:

(1) Deliver into a storage tank or container any motor vehicle fuel or lubricant other than the product identified on the label attached to the storage tank or container.

(2) Sell by means of, or through, a pump or other device, any motor vehicle fuel or lubricant other than the product identified on the required label, tag, or sign attached to the pump or other device.

(b) This section does not prohibit the delivery
 of motor vehicle fuel into a storage tank labeled with the authorized rebrand as provided in Article 14 (commencing with Section 13560).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 35.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13489.

The use of pumps or other devices which are capable of withdrawing gasoline from each of two tanks containing different qualities of the same petroleum product and dispensing them as a single combined product shall be authorized when the department determines that all of the following conditions exist:

(a) The device mechanism accurately measures the quantities of the gasoline being simultaneously withdrawn from each of the two tanks and the quantity dispensed.

(b) The device mechanism accurately and visibly records and displays the resulting combined quality, the total quantity, the price per gallon or liter for the particular quality combination being dispensed, and the total price of the quantity of gasoline dispensed at the particular sale.

(c) The device has a locking selector mechanism which prevents the changing of the proportion of the two qualities being combined during the dispensing of the desired quantity.

The provisions of this section shall not supersede any other provisions in this chapter, except that they shall supersede the provisions of Sections 13442, 13443, 13480, 13483, 13486, 13487, and 13488 to the extent necessary to authorize the operation of a blending type of pump connected to two tanks containing two different products, or two different grades of the same product, which, when blended together in different proportions, will produce gasolines of different octane rating, each blend of which shall meet the specifications for gasoline as required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1047, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

13490.

The use of pumps or other devices which are capable of withdrawing gasoline from one tank and motor oil, or a premixture of gasoline and motor oil in a known ratio, from another tank, and dispensing them as a single combined product, or of withdrawing gasoline alone from the tank containing gasoline and of withdrawing a premixture of gasoline and motor oil alone from the tank containing a premixture of gasoline and motor oil shall be authorized when the department determines that all the following conditions exist:

(a) The device mechanism accurately measures the quantities being simultaneously withdrawn for dispensing as a combined product from each of the two tanks when the combined product is dispensed, the quantity being dispensed from the gasoline tank when gasoline alone is dispensed, or the quantity being dispensed from the tank containing a premixture of gasoline and motor oil when the premixture alone is dispensed.

(b) The device mechanism accurately and visibly records and displays: (1) the ratio of gasoline to motor oil or premixture, the quantity of each ingredient being dispensed, the price per gallon or liter for the gasoline being dispensed, and the price per quart or liter for any motor oil or premixture being dispensed or (2) the ratio of gasoline to motor oil or premixture and the price per gallon or liter for the product being dispensed.

(c) The device mechanism prevents the changing of the ratio of gasoline to motor oil or premixture during dispensing.

The provisions of this section shall supersede Sections 13442, 13443, 13480, 13483, 13486, 13487, and 13488 to the extent necessary to authorize the operation of the above-described blending type of pump connected to two tanks, one containing motor oil, or a premixture of motor oil and gasoline in a known ratio, and the other gasoline, provided that the motor oil shall in its separate state meet the specifications for motor oil as required by Section 13460 and that the gasoline shall in its separate state meet the specifications for gasoline as required by Section 13440.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1047, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Tank Vehicles [13500. - 13503.]

13500.

It is unlawful for any person to transport in any tank vehicle, for the purpose of sale or for delivery to any place where motor vehicle fuels or lubricants are stored for sale, any product referred to in this chapter unless there is firmly affixed at each outlet or valve of the tank vehicle, a metal tag, plate, or label. The tag, plate, or label shall display, in letters not less than one-half inch in height, the name and grade of the product in the tank compartment of the tank vehicle. In the case of motor oil, the SAE International viscosity number shall also be displayed on the tag, plate, or label.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 36.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13501.

It is unlawful for any person, when delivering for the purpose of sale, or delivering to any place where products referred to in this chapter are kept for sale, to commingle any product with another product or to commingle grades of a product, if as a result of the commingling the product delivered does not meet the specifications adopted or established by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 37.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13502.

It is unlawful for any person to deliver into a storage tank or container at any place where products referred to in this chapter are stored for sale, any product other than the product identified on the label attached to the storage tank or container.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 38.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13503.

It is unlawful to deliver aviation gasolines to the fuel tank of any aircraft through the same meter used for deliveries of gasolines not specifically refined or manufactured for aviation use.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 698, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Basis of Settlement [13520. - 13520.]

13520.

It is unlawful for any distributor or for any broker to sell any product to a retailer or to any person, when the quantity distributed in any single delivery to a single location is 5,000 or more gallons, as, or purporting to be, gasoline or diesel fuel, unless the distributor or broker, as the case may be, offers to invoice the purchaser for such gasoline or diesel fuel on the basis of temperature-corrected gallonage to 60 degrees Fahrenheit for all such deliveries to the purchaser over a period of 12 consecutive months and settles his accounts with the purchaser on the same basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Price Sign Advertising [13530. - 13540.]

13530.

(a) Nothing in this article applies to price indicators and signs referred to in Article 8 (commencing with Section 13470). However, any numerals designating the total price per gallon, liter, or other unit of measurement adopted pursuant to Section 12107, 13404, or 13404.5 for a particular brand and grade of motor vehicle fuel permitted or required under Article 8 (commencing with Section 13470) shall, unless otherwise stated, be identical in numerical value with the price per gallon, liter, or other unit of measurement for the same brand and grade of motor vehicle fuel permitted or required under this article.

(b) Nothing in this chapter requires that the cash or merchandise value
 of trading stamps be stated on any advertising media that either advertises the stamps or advertises the price of motor vehicle fuel.

(c) Unless otherwise prohibited, any person selling motor vehicle fuel by the liter shall be authorized to advertise its price by displaying on the advertising medium either the price per liter or the price per gallon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 39.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13531.

(a) (1) Every person offering for sale or selling any motor vehicle fuel to the public from any place of business shall display on the premises an advertising medium that complies with the requirements of this article and that advertises the total prices of the three major grades of motor vehicle fuel offered for sale.

(2) The advertising medium shall be clearly visible from the street or highway adjacent to the premises. When the place of business is situated at an intersection, the advertising medium shall be clearly visible from each street of the intersection.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, motor
 vehicle fuel does not include propane or dimethyl ether-propane fuel blend.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, electricity and natural gas sold as a motor vehicle fuel shall meet only the requirements adopted pursuant to Sections 13404 and 13404.5.

(b) The governing body of any city, county, or city and county may, by ordinance, exempt specified geographic areas from the provisions of this section if, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 65300) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, the areas are designated on the local general plan as scenic corridors or historic preservation areas.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any person who violates the provisions of subdivision (a) is guilty of an infraction and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine not to exceed five
 hundred dollars ($500).

(2) Any person who violates the provisions of subdivision (a) and who has been previously convicted two or more times of a violation of subdivision (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 13590, the district attorney of each county, or pursuant to Section 41803.5 of the Government Code, the city attorney of any general law city or chartered city within each county, or the county sealer, shall, upon complaint or upon their own motion, enforce the provisions of this section and, in addition, may bring an action for injunctive relief in accordance with Section
 13611.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 117, Sec. 3.   (AB 2663)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13532.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to display any advertising medium that indicates the price of motor vehicle fuel unless the advertising medium displays all of the following:

(1) The total price per gallon, liter, or other unit of measurement adopted pursuant to Section 12107, 13404, or 13404.5, including all taxes, in numerals, and fractions when applicable, not less than six inches in height and of uniform size and color. For purposes of this article, fractions are considered one numeral. For purposes of this section, electricity sold as a motor vehicle fuel shall meet only the requirements adopted pursuant to Section 13404.5.

(2) The trademark or brand of
 the motor vehicle fuel in letters, figures, or numerals not less than one-third the size of the numerals designating the price.

(3) The word “gasoline” or the name of other motor vehicle fuel in letters not less than one-third the size of the numerals designating the price, but these words need not be more than four inches in height.

(4) The grade designation of the motor vehicle fuel in letters or numerals not less than one-sixth the size of the numerals designating the price, but this designation need not be more than four inches in height.

(5) If motor vehicle fuel prices are advertised by the unit of measurement other than gallon, the unit shall be displayed on the advertising medium in letters not less than one-third the size of the numerals designating the price.

(b) (1) It is unlawful for any person to display an advertising medium that advertises a discount or price reduction for motor vehicle fuel, unless the advertising medium contains all the following:

(A) The total price per gallon, liter, or other unit of measurement adopted pursuant to Section 12107, 13404, or 13404.5 from which the discount or price reduction is to be taken.

(B) The amount of the discount or price reduction in cents per gallon, liter, or other unit of measurement using numerals that do not exceed the height of the numerals in the advertised price.

(C) The conditions of the discount or price reduction using words whose letters are not less than one-third the size of the price numerals.

(2) Any limitations under which the discount or price reduction is offered shall be explained in words whose letters are not less than one-third the size of the numerals indicating the prices.

(3) There shall be available for each customer’s reference, a chart showing the amount of discount for each type of unit being sold or fraction thereof in one cent ($0.01) increments, or the retail dispensers used to dispense motor vehicle fuel at the discount price shall be set to compute the total sale at the discounted price per gallon or liter and shall be clearly labeled “Includes Cash Discount” in letters not less than one inch in height.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, the motor vehicle fuel shall be sold in the same unit of measure in which the discount and the price from which the discount is taken are
 advertised.

(c) In the event that the same grade of motor vehicle fuel is sold at different prices from any single place of business, it is unlawful for any person to display any advertising medium that advertises a price of a grade of motor vehicle fuel unless the advertising medium advertises in numerals of equal size each of the higher prices, including all taxes for which the grade is sold or offered for sale, and unless the advertising medium explains the conditions, and any limitations, under which that grade is sold or offered for sale at different prices. The words of explanation shall be clearly shown in letters at least one-third the size of the numerals indicating the prices. The different prices at which the same grade of motor vehicle fuel is sold or offered for sale shall be advertised in the same unit of measure as permitted or required by law.

(d) Nothing in this
 section prohibits any person who has posted or displayed a sign or advertising medium in compliance with this chapter from displaying additional signs or advertising media that state either (1) the amount of discount in cents per gallon, liter, or other unit of measurement adopted pursuant to Section 12107, 13404, or 13404.5, or (2) the total price of one or more brands or grades of motor vehicle fuel sold or offered for sale, provided the conditions and any limitations of the discount or price of the brand or grade of motor vehicle fuel are included in the additional advertising media in letters not less than one-third the size of the numerals indicating the discount or price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 208, Sec. 1.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13533.

It shall be unlawful for any person to display on or near the premises of any place of business in this state any advertising medium which advertises the price of motor oil offered for sale without conspicuously showing on the same advertising medium the brand of the motor oil and the name of the product. The letters, figures and numerals used to designate the brand and the name of the product shall not be less than one-half the size of the numerals designating the price.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 698, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

13534.

(a) Except as provided by subdivision (b), and subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 13532, it is unlawful for any person to place any additional advertising matter on any advertising medium referred to in this article except:

(1) A description of the products offered for sale in letters or numerals not larger than the price numerals.

(2) Methods of sale, such as self-serve or full-serve, in letters not less than one-third the size of the price numerals.

(3) Words describing the type of services offered at the place of business, such as food market, carwash, tune up, and the registered trademark or trade name of the service, but not the price of the service.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to electronic changeable message centers when the advertising content includes both the product offered for sale and its price in a single advertising message, or when the product and price components of the advertising message clearly relate to one another and the price neither starts nor ends the message.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 72, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

13535.

If any motor vehicle fuel or lubricant is advertised for sale, but not under any brand designation, the words “no brand” shall be used on the advertising medium as a brand designation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 42.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13536.

All letters, words, figures, or numerals which are part of the advertising media referred to in this article shall have a heavy type face or stroke, shall be clearly visible, and of a color or tint that will contrast the letters, words, figures, or numerals with the background of the advertising media. The height of the letters, figures, and numerals, except the letter “l” and numeral one, shall not be more than twice the width.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

13540.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit the governing body of any city, county, or city and county from enacting ordinances, including, but not limited to, land use and zoning ordinances, which impose restrictions on the advertising medium referred to in this article, so long as any provisions of the ordinances dealing with matters specifically covered in this article are identical to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 698, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Inducements for the Sale of Motor Vehicle Fuel [13550. - 13550.]

13550.
